Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
81-12,165
Department; contract authorized.

The department
may enter into a contract with a Nebraska-based nonprofit entity for the purposes
of carrying out any or all of the provisions of the Business Innovation Act.

Laws 2011, LB387, § 14.
October 1, 2011October 1, 2016